Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 45 Regional Vocational Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-45-1.
Establishment — Maintenance.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education is authorized and empowered to establish and maintain regional schools for vocational and technological training and instruction with any equipment, apparatus, books, and supplies that shall be necessary for instruction and for proper maintenance of the schools, and for these purposes the department of elementary and secondary education shall appoint and remove necessary instructors, teachers, and other employees, determine their compensation, fix the standards and terms upon which students shall be received and instructed in and discharged from the schools, and make all rules and regulations necessary for the control, management, and operation of the schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1.

16-45-1.1.
Declaration of policy.

The overall mission of vocational education in Rhode Island is to develop programs and services from elementary level through secondary, postsecondary, and adult levels to prepare students for productive employment or additional education without prematurely limiting them to a particular occupational or educational choice.

Vocational education is defined as a state approved educational program below the baccalaureate level taught by a properly certified teacher, designed to:

Prepare individuals for gainful employment in recognized and/or emerging clusters of related occupations;

Assist individuals in making informed occupational choices; and

Upgrade individuals already in an occupational field.

Pre-vocational education is defined as instruction which introduces students to a variety of employment opportunities and which facilitates the process of choosing a career appropriate to a student’s interest and aptitude.

The following principles apply to the development and operation of all vocational programs, activities, and services:

Access. All youth and adults who choose vocational education shall have access to those programs.

A public awareness program shall provide information regarding state approved vocational programs to students and their parents in their native language.

A full range of programs and supplemental services shall be provided for those students whose previous achievements and preparation indicate that additional support is necessary for them to succeed in vocational education.

Admissions criteria and assessment procedures shall promote equal access, enrollment, and participation in vocational programs regardless of age, sex, race, limited English proficiency, disadvantagement, or disability.

Purpose.

The purpose of vocational education is preparation for direct placement into the world of work consistent with economic development needs and/or preparation for postsecondary education.

Vocational preparation aims at:

The development of academic, technical, problem solving, critical thinking skills, and concepts related to a cluster of allied occupations as well as specific job entry requirements.

Graduating students with an understanding of the total enterprise of an occupational field and the ability to adapt to technological change.

Vocational assessment, guidance, support services, bilingual resources, placement services, and transitional planning should be provided to all students appropriate to their individual needs.

Student understanding of community needs, conditions of employment, and skills or attributes are best gained in the work environment through cooperative education, and other work related programs of instruction.

Vocational programs shall be organized for maximum articulation between educational levels.

Participation. There shall be broad representation and full participation in planning, developing, implementing, and evaluating vocational programs.

A comprehensive and coordinated system of vocational education can best be achieved by the collective action of many agencies of which the school is the major one.

Vocational programs should be developed with participation from students, parents, educators, workers and representatives of labor, community based organizations, business, and special populations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 601, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 33; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 33.

16-45-2.
Curriculum — Certificates.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may authorize the registration of students in the regional vocational schools, arrange the curriculum, and at the completion of a course or courses issue a certificate stating that the student has completed the course and achieved proficiency in the course.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1.

16-45-3.
Evaluation for future programming.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall begin an investigation and upon its findings shall from time to time review and evaluate the specific vocational needs of the entire state. It shall annually report the evaluation to the governor and the general assembly and make recommendations for future programming of courses and facilities for vocational and technological training.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1.

16-45-4.
Regional school established — Appropriation.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall immediately undertake the construction of a regional vocational school at a site to be selected by the board in an industrial area in the Blackstone Valley. The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of acquiring a site and for the constructing and equipping the regional vocational school; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sums or so much of the sum as may be required from time to time upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 250, § 1.

16-45-4.1.
Regional special programs.

Each city and town may contract with the William E. Davies, Jr. vocational-technical high school to establish and operate programs for special populations including students with disabilities and potential school dropouts.

When these programs are operated by the William E. Davies, Jr. vocational-technical high school, each participating city or town shall be assessed for the cost of the program in the proportion that their enrollment bears to the total enrollment in the program. These assessments shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 45; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 33; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 33.

16-45-4.2.
Disposition of funds.

All tuition and other revenues collected by the school shall be deposited as general revenue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 45.

16-45-5.
Acceptance and expenditure of federal funds.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education is designated as the agency of this state and shall have full and complete authority to cooperate with and enter into contracts and agreements with the federal government, its agency, or instrumentality in all matters relating to the furtherance of the establishment of vocational and technological schools and the advancement of vocational and technological training programs and to perform any acts that may be necessary and to make application for, receive, and expend in accordance with any requirements, terms, rules, regulations, and conditions as may be established any grants, grants-in-aid, or funds authorized or appropriated by Congress and made available for these purposes to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education by the federal government or any agency or instrumentality of the federal government. The proceeds of grants or funds received shall be paid to the general treasurer who shall place the funds in a special account which shall be utilized for the purposes of these grants; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sums or so much of the sum as may be required upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may authorize any state officer or employee to act as agent of the federal government, as may be provided in any federal legislation within the purview of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1.

16-45-6.
Powers additional to previous authority.

The powers delegated and authorized in this chapter for the board of regents for elementary and secondary education and the department of elementary and secondary education shall be in addition to those previously authorized by any other general or public law.

The governance, funding, and programming of the William M. Davies, Jr. vocational technical school and the Metropolitan Career and Technical School shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations formulated by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42. Provided, however, the additional appropriation by the General Assembly in fiscal year 2005 for the William M. Davies, Jr. Vocational Technical School shall be used to fund sixty (60) additional placements. Forty (40) of those placements shall be made available to students from the City of Providence.

The purpose of this chapter is to restructure the system of career and technical schools in Rhode Island for the benefit of the students, the economy, and the general welfare. The paramount aim is to enable the schools to make more significant contributions in providing the state’s students with the career preparation they need to compete and succeed in the world of today and of the future. To ensure student success, a system of model career and technical schools will be established and supported. These schools will provide: integrated academic and vocational curricula, up to date technology, programs to meet the varying needs of all students, and strong links to business, industry, postsecondary education, and the community.

There shall be a system of state operated career and technical schools serving geographic areas of the state. Students attending these regional schools will do so on a full time basis with the costs for their education at the regional school being shared by the state and the district of residence as described in §

16-7.2-5

. State schools currently participating in the state retirement system that are not receiving reimbursement pursuant to §

16-16-22

shall have their state aid adjusted to reflect full reimbursement for expenses related to employer retirement contributions for those staff employed by the state.

These schools shall be operated as local education agencies and each shall be governed by a board of trustees. With the exception of those powers and duties reserved by the director, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, the board of trustees shall have the powers and duties of school committees. The Davies school shall be the first school operated under the provisions of this chapter and shall be renamed the William M. Davies, Jr. career and technical high school. The Metropolitan Career and Technical School shall be the second school operated under the provisions of this chapter.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall appoint the members of the board of trustees from nominations made by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The chairperson shall also be selected in this manner. The board of regents shall determine the number, qualifications, and terms of office of members of the board of trustees. The board of trustees will be broadly representative of the local communities served by each school and the larger statewide workforce interests.

The board of regents shall establish strategic directions for the career and technical education system that are consistent with the state’s economic development plans, workforce requirements, and educational priorities and learner outcomes established by the board of regents.

The board of regents shall provide parameters for the overall budget requests, approve the budget, and participate in budget development as required in subsection (i).

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall recommend parameters for the overall budget requests, recommend a budget and participate in budget development as required in subsection (i).

The commissioner shall approve the process for selection of a director of each regional school. The commissioner shall develop a plan for statewide implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

The board of trustees shall meet monthly and serve without compensation. Nine (9) members of the board of trustees shall be required to attend teacher appeal hearings conducted pursuant to §

16-13-4

. The board of trustees shall have broad policy making authority for the operation of the school consistent with subsection (e) and the following powers and duties:

To identify the educational needs of the communities in the district.

To develop educational policies to meet the needs of students in the communities served by the school district.

To appoint a director of its regional school to serve as its chief executive officer and to approve assistant and associate directors from nominations made by the director.

To provide policy guidance and participate in budget development as required in subsection (i).

To develop staffing policies which ensure that all students are taught by educators of the highest possible quality.

The director will serve at the pleasure of the board of trustees with the initial appointment to be for a period of not more than three (3) years, provided, that the term and conditions of employment are subject to the approval of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

It is the responsibility of the director to manage and operate the school on a day to day basis. The director’s duties shall include the following:

To be responsible for the entire care, supervision, and management of the career and technical high school.

To recommend to the board of trustees educational policies to meet the needs of the district, and to implement policies established by the board of trustees.

To present nominations to the board of trustees for assistant and associate directors and to appoint all other school personnel.

To provide for the evaluation of all school district personnel.

To establish a school based management approach for decision making for the operation of the school.

To prepare a budget and participate in budget development as required in subsection (i), and to authorize purchases consistent with the adopted school district budget.

To report to the board of trustees on a regular basis the financial condition and operation of the school, and to report annually on the educational progress of the school.

To establish appropriate advisory committees as needed to provide guidance on new directions and feedback on the operation of the school.

With policy guidance from the board of trustees and extensive involvement of the administrators and faculty in the school, the director of each regional school shall annually prepare a budget. The board of trustees will approve the budget and transmit it to the commissioner. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, shall provide parameters for the overall budget request. Based on review and recommendation by the commissioner, the board of regents shall approve the total budget and incorporate it into its budget request to the governor and to the general assembly. Line item budgeting decisions shall be the responsibility of the director.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to bargain collectively pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28 or to allow the board of trustees or the director to abrogate any agreement by collective bargaining. Employees at the William M. Davies school shall continue to be state employees and the bargaining units which are presently established at the school shall remain intact.

Any tuition payments, which are made to the William M. Davies Career and Technical high school from the district of residence of its students, as authorized in R.I.G.L. §

16-7.2-5

, shall be deposited into a restricted receipt account to be used for the same educational purposes that its state appropriation is used. Any such funds shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of §

35-4-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 10, § 6.

16-45-6.1.
Career and technical education.

The general assembly finds that career and technical education (“CTE”) programs that meet the CTE board of trustees’ industry developed standards prepare Rhode Island’s students to succeed in a wide variety of employment settings are a critical component of the state’s public education system and a necessary element of the state’s economic development. CTE programs that meet the CTE board of trustees’ standards are located in the regional career and technical education centers and comprehensive high schools and are helping students graduate high school with the skills to secure a job with a family-sustaining wage.

The general assembly further finds that the proportion of students now enrolled in such programs is inadequate to meet the needs of Rhode Island’s growing economy. Rhode Island’s employers are best positioned to assist in establishing a high-quality system of secondary and postsecondary career and technical education. To assist in the development of a high-quality system of CTE, the CTE board of trustees shall review and annually provide recommendations to the board of education regarding issues impacting secondary and postsecondary career and technical education, including, but not limited to, program quality, industry alignment, the effective use of state and federal CTE funding, the allocation of CTE funding, and expenditures of CTE funding, program outcomes, work-based learning, transportation, and graduation requirements. The report and recommendations shall be provided to the board of education no later than October 15 of each year.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 278, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 279, § 1.]

To sustain and advance the economic development of our communities, all students retain the right to enroll in a state approved career and technical education program approved by the CTE board of trustees in communities outside their community of residence. This right does not apply to locally developed CTE programs, locally approved CTE programs, pathway programs, or other programs that are not approved by the CTE board of trustees. Students shall have a right to request enrollment and to enroll in a CTE board of trustees’ approved program outside of their community of residence when a substantially similar or same (“substantially similar”) CTE board of trustees approved program is not offered within their community of residence.

In determining whether two programs are substantially similar, the CTE board of trustees shall consider the following factors:

Program type;

Information on the occupation that the student will be prepared for;

The credentials the student will earn;

The type of work-based learning that the student will be provided access to;

The ability to access advanced course experiences; and

Such additional factors as the CTE board of trustees deem to be relevant, including postsecondary attainment, industry partnerships and advisory boards, and program quality.

Effective January 15, 2022, and every year thereafter, the CTE board of trustees and the department of elementary and secondary education shall publish a detailed list of substantially similar CTE programs for the upcoming school year. The list will be used to support students and their families in accessing CTE board of trustees approved career and technical education programs. There will be a thirty-day (30) period for schools and districts to appeal the substantially similar designation to the board of education.

Students enrolled in, accepted to, or attending a state CTE board-approved program (the “program of choice”) prior to January 1, 2022, which program is outside of their home district but is considered to be substantially similar to a program in their home district, shall be allowed to remain enrolled in that program of choice as set forth in subsection (j) of this section.

Students may request access to state CTE board-approved career preparation programs outside their school district if their home district does not provide a substantially similar state-approved CTE program. If a discrepancy exists as to whether two (2) state-approved programs are substantially similar, the state CTE board shall use state CTE board program quality criteria set forth in subsection (d) of this section to determine if the two (2) state CTE board-approved programs are substantially similar programs. The decision of the CTE board shall be final.

A student’s request to enroll in an out of district state CTE board-approved career and technical program shall not be denied, provided that:

A substantially similar program is not available in the student’s home district;

The student meets any other criteria required of all students for admission to the out of district program and the center; and

When there is more than one recognized CTE program in a transportation region, the student is applying to the center that is geographically the closest program to the student’s residence.

Students requesting access to state CTE board-approved career preparation programs outside their established school transportation region may enroll in such programs that are not substantially similar to a program in their home district. In such event, with respect to transportation costs, the resident’s local education agency shall only be responsible for paying the resident district’s average per pupil expenditure for student transportation for all students in the district. The receiving district shall pay any remaining balance due for transportation costs associated with the particular student.

The sending district shall pay the average of the per-pupil expenditure of the receiving district and sending district when paying out-of-district tuitions for students in CTE programs.

When two or more substantially similar programs are available within a student’s transportation district, that student may enroll in the program that is not geographically closest only if the receiving district agrees to pay all the transportation costs to and from the receiving district.

All eligible CTE programs shall align to CTE board of trustees’ program standards. Programs that do not meet this standard shall not be eligible to enroll out-of-district students and receive state or federal CTE funding.

All state CTE board-approved programs shall align to industry standards or be associated with a nationally recognized CTE board-approved program.

Students enrolled in, accepted to, or attending a state CTE board-approved program of choice outside of the students’ home district as of January 1, 2022, shall be exempt from the substantially similar provisions of this section and may continue to matriculate in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) in their program of choice so that students and parents who made educational decisions prior to January 1, 2022, shall retain the rights that were in place when they made those decisions. If a substantially similar state-approved program is established in a student’s home district after the student has enrolled in a program of choice, the student may continue to matriculate in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) in the student’s program of choice provided the student remains enrolled in the program. The sending district may request, and shall be provided by the district with the chosen CTE program, information on the students’ progress in programs, including attendance and grades. The provisions of this subsection shall also apply and extend to other siblings in the family who apply to attend the same program of choice.

Career and technical funds allocated under §

16-7.2-6

shall be used solely for the purpose of funding improvements to state CTE board-approved career and technical education programs and facilities or for funding related to the establishment of new career and technical programs in our state.

The limitations related to enrollment in CTE programs contained within this chapter shall not apply to the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center or the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School. All eligible students, from any and all Rhode Island cities and towns, have the right to pursue enrollment and enroll in, subject to applicable enrollment procedures, the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center or the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School’s programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 11; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 57; P.L. 2021, ch. 278, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 279, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-45-6.2.
The Paul W. Crowley Metropolitan Career and Technical Center.

The Metropolitan Career and Technical Center, in Newport, Rhode Island, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Paul W. Crowley Metropolitan Career and Technical Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 188, § 1.

16-45-7.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for the purpose of reducing local district area vocational technical school tuition. All districts which send students to state operated schools which are funded through the operations aid formula shall not be entitled to receive funds under this section for students attending those schools.

Each year one hundred percent (100%) of the approved regional vocational school expenditures for the reference year is appropriated. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall be responsible for approving regional vocational technical school budgets and eligible programs and shall promulgate rules and regulations for the approval of budget expenditures and operation of the schools. All funds provided by this section will be ineligible for reimbursement under the provisions of chapter 7 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 601, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 11; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 30, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 32, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 487, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 48.

16-45-8.
Temporary service to other regions.

Any resident of the state being qualified shall, until a vocational school is in operation in the region in which he or she resides, be eligible to register at, receive instruction from, and be issued a certificate by the regional vocational school serving the inhabitants of the greater Providence area.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 8, § 1.

16-45-9.
Vocational education.

Upon the establishment of full funding of §

16-45-7

, the regulations promulgated by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education for the administration and operation of career and technical schools shall go into effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 12, § 1.

16-45-10.
Payment of past due vocational school tuition.

If a sending school district fails to pay the requisite tuition to a school district hosting a vocational school, the commissioner of education may, based upon an affidavit filed by the host community, deduct the requisite sums from the state aid of the sending district and pay these sums over to the host district. The sending district may request a hearing if the debt is disputed, but the deductions and payments shall continue to be made during the pendency of the hearing and any appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 46, § 1.

16-45-11.
Legislative career and technical education commission established.

Commission established. There is hereby established a special joint legislative study commission on career and technical education commission. Said career and technical education study commission shall consist of twelve (12) members: six (6) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from among the members of the house of representatives, not more than five (5) of whom shall be from the same political party; six (6) members shall be appointed by the president of the senate from among the members of the senate, not more than five (5) of whom shall be from the same political party.

Purpose. The purpose of the career and technical education study commission shall be to make a comprehensive examination of the issues relating to the governance, financing, and operation of the system of career and technical education in Rhode Island in order to guide the implementation of the recommendations contained in the Restructuring Career and Technical Education in Rhode Island report as prepared and presented by the career and technical education task force (March 2000). The focus of the career and technical education study commission shall include, but not be limited to, the following: to promote Rhode Island’s education and economic development by providing guidance for the development of a statewide system for career and technical education, utilizing effective and proven career and technical education delivery models; implementing an effective system of governance, including protection for the student rights of those students interested in engaging in career and technical education; financing and maintaining state of the art equipment, facilities, and programming, including ensuring student access to the same across the district and geographic boundaries; and strengthening career and technical education programming designed to meet the labor needs of Rhode Island business and industry, as well as to support and advance Rhode Island’s economy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 6.